Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.425

Program to certify employment for public service loan forgiveness—Awareness materials—Statewide initiative.

(1) The office shall:

(a) Develop a program for state agencies to certify employment for the purposes of the public service loan forgiveness program by July 1, 2023.

(b) Assist the student loan advocate in creating and distributing materials designed to increase awareness of the public service loan forgiveness program set forth in RCW 28B.77.009.

(c) Collaborate with the student achievement council, the employment security department, the department of retirement systems, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, nonprofit entities, local government representatives, and other public service employers in developing a statewide initiative to improve access and remove barriers to the public service loan forgiveness program for all public service employees. The program established for state agencies in this section and the certification process in RCW 41.04.045 may be considered in the development of the initiative. A plan for a statewide initiative must be developed and submitted to the higher education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.

(2) For purposes of this section, the definitions in this subsection apply:

(a) "Certifying employment" means either completing the employer sections of the public service loan forgiveness form or sharing data directly with the United States department of education that corresponds to the information required for the public service loan forgiveness form, as allowed by the United States department of education.

(b) "Public service employer" includes the following:

(i) Any governmental entity including state, county, city, or other local government entity including political subdivisions, such as office, department, independent agency, school district, public college or university system, public library system, authority, or other body including the legislature and the judiciary;

(ii) Any employer that has received designation as a tax-exempt organization pursuant to Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended;

(iii) Any other entities identified as a public service job in Title 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087e(m).

(c) "Public service loan forgiveness program" means the federal loan forgiveness program established pursuant to Title 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087e(m) and 34 C.F.R. Sec. 685.219.

(d) "State agency" or "agency" means departments, offices, agencies, or institutions of state government, the legislature, institutions of higher education, school districts, and educational service districts.

[ 2024 c 2 s 3; 2023 c 470 s 3016; 2022 c 248 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Intent—Effective date—2022 c 248: See notes following RCW 28B.77.009.